California, session 20252026, SB1310.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 205.5 is added to the Code of Civil Procedure, to read:205.5. Notwithstanding any other law, a jury commissioner shall provide information to the Secretary of State and the county elections official about a prospective juror who provides information in a juror affidavit that contains an attestation by the prospective juror under penalty of perjury that they are not qualified for jury service for a reason that would also make them ineligible to vote. because the prospective juror is not a United States citizen or not a resident of the county.SEC. 2. Section 2215 is added to the Elections Code, to read:2215. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a jury commissioner shall provide notice to the Secretary of State and the county elections official if the jury commissioner receives information from a juror affidavit that contains an attestation by the prospective juror under penalty of perjury that they are not qualified for jury service for a reason that would also make them ineligible to vote. because the prospective juror is not a United States citizen or not a resident of the county. The notice shall include the information received by the jury commissioner demonstrating that the prospective juror is ineligible to vote.(b) (1) An elections official who receives information about a registered voter pursuant to subdivision (a) shall determine if the person is ineligible to vote. If the elections official makes this determination, the elections official shall inactivate the voter’s registration and send a notice to the voter that provides them an opportunity to confirm their eligibility to vote. If the elections official does not receive a response from the voter within 15 days of the date the notice is sent that demonstrates their eligibility to vote, the elections official shall cancel the voter’s registration.(c)If the jury commissioner provides information to the elections official that a prospective juror who is a registered voter is not a resident of the county in which they are summoned, along with a current residence address for the prospective juror in another county in California, and if the jury commissioner provides no other information demonstrating that the prospective juror is ineligible to vote, the elections official shall update the prospective juror’s voter registration with their current address.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if all of the following requirements are met, the elections official shall not cancel a person’s voter registration and shall instead update the person’s registration with the person’s current address:(A) The person is a United States citizen.(B) The jury commissioner informs the elections official that the person is not a resident of the county in which they are summoned.(C) The jury commissioner provides a current residence address for the person in another county.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.